Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 13. Ordinances

§ 21-13-1.
Authority to pass; penalties.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to pass all ordinances and to enforce the same by a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment not exceeding ninety (90) days, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2957; 1906, § 3348; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5845; 1930, § 2424; 1942, § 3374-137; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 137; Laws, 1964, ch. 497; Laws, 1977, ch. 315; Laws, 1984, ch. 353, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 21-13-3.
How certain actions are to be taken.

The governing authorities of any municipality may provide by ordinance, order or resolution for the appropriation of monies for the operation of the municipal government, which monies shall be paid as provided for in any such ordinance, order or resolution. However, any ordinance granting a franchise or any right to use or occupy the streets, highways, bridges or public places in the municipality for any purpose, except ordinances, resolutions or other actions for the immediate and temporary preservation of the public peace, health or safety, shall be introduced in writing at a regular meeting of the governing body of such municipality and shall thereafter remain on file with the municipal clerk for public inspection for at least two (2) weeks before the final passage or adoption thereof. Upon request of one or more members of the governing authorities, any such ordinance shall be read by the clerk before a vote is taken thereon. In addition, every franchise or grant of any kind to use or occupy the street, highway, bridges, or other public places of such municipality to any interurban or street railway, railroad, gas works, water works, electric light or power plant, heating plant, telephone or telegraph system, or other public utility operating within such municipality must be approved by the passage of the ordinance granting same by a majority of the qualified electors of such municipality voting thereon at a general or special election.

The vote on final passage of all municipal ordinances shall be taken by both “yeas” and “nays”, which shall be entered on the minutes by the clerk. A vote shall never be taken on any ordinance not previously reduced to writing. Upon request of one or more members of the municipal governing authorities, any ordinance shall be read by the clerk before a vote is taken thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6053; 1930, § 2641; 1942, § 3374-73; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 73; Laws, 1971, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 503, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 21-13-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch 503, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

[Codes, 1892, § 3007; 1906, § 3405; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5935; 1930, § 2543; 1942, § 3374-71; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 71]

§ 21-13-7.
Style of ordinances.

The style of all municipal ordinances shall be “Be it ordained by the mayor and board of aldermen (or other proper governing body, as the case may be) of the city (or town or village, as the case may be) of_______________ ,”.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3006; 1906, § 3404; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5934; 1930, § 2542; 1942, § 3374-70; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 70, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-13-9.
Ordinances shall not contain more than one subject; amendments.

An ordinance shall not contain more than one (1) subject, which shall be clearly expressed in its title. An ordinance shall be amended by section or sections, and the original section or sections shall thereby be repealed. Each amendment to a section or sections of an ordinance shall have a title which clearly indicates the subject matter or matters of the amendment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3008; 1906, § 3406; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5936; 1930, § 2544; 1942, § 3374-74; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 74; Laws, 1982, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1982).

§ 21-13-11.
Effective date of ordinances; emergency measures.

Every ordinance passed by the governing body of a municipality, except as is otherwise provided by law, shall be certified by a municipal clerk, signed by the mayor or a majority of all the members of the governing body, recorded in the ordinance book, and published at least one (1) time in some newspaper published in such municipality, or, if there be no such newspaper, then in a newspaper within the county having general circulation in said municipality, or, if there be no newspaper published in or having general circulation in same, then in any newspaper published in the State of Mississippi having general circulation in said county; and all of same shall be done before such ordinance shall be effective. The publication of the ordinance may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19. No ordinance shall be in force for one (1) month after its passage; however, any ordinance for the immediate and temporary preservation of the public peace, health or safety or for other good cause, which is adopted by unanimous vote of all members of the governing body, may be made effective from and after its passage by a unanimous vote of all members of the governing body. However, in such cases, such ordinance shall contain a statement of reason why it is necessary that same become immediately effective. All such ordinances shall be published and recorded in the ordinance book in the same manner as other ordinances, but shall become effective immediately upon the adoption thereof, and prior to being so recorded and published. Nothing in this section shall apply to ordinances appropriating money for the payment of the current expenses of the municipality or the payment of sums due on any contract previously made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3006; 1906, § 3404; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5934, 6054; 1930, §§ 2542, 2642; 1942, § 3374-72; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 72; Laws, 1966, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 2, eff from and after December 8, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).

§ 21-13-13.
Ordinance record.

The municipal clerk shall keep a record of permanent construction, to be entitled “Ordinances of the City, Town or Village of_______________ ,” in which he shall enter at length, in cases where same have not already been entered, every ordinance in force, and every ordinance hereafter enacted immediately after its passage. Such ordinances shall be entered in typewriting, or in a plain and distinct handwriting, and the clerk shall append to each ordinance a note stating the date of its passage, and shall cite therein the record and page of the minutes containing the record of its passage. All ordinances which have been previously passed by any municipality which are not so entered in the ordinance record, and all ordinances hereafter passed which are not entered in the ordinance record, shall be void and of no effect. The ordinances which are to be recorded in such ordinance record are those which are in their nature laws of the municipality, and are not mere resolutions, orders or decrees of a temporary nature. It shall be the duty of the municipal clerk to keep the ordinance record indexed alphabetically.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3009; 1906, § 3407; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5937; 1930, § 2545; 1942, § 3374-75; Laws, 1950, chs. 507, 491, § 75; Laws, 1966, ch. 591, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-13-15.
Revision and publication of ordinances.

The municipality may from time to time authorize the revision and codification of the ordinances, and their publication in pamphlet or book form. When so revised, arranged, classified and codified, said book or pamphlet may be adopted by ordinance as the official code of ordinances of the municipality without compliance with the requirements pertaining to the passage of ordinances. Such official code of ordinances may be amended by section or sections in the manner provided in this chapter. The municipality may cause to be published in connection therewith the laws relating to municipalities, with such annotations of supreme court decisions thereon as may be proper, and such forms and instructions as it shall deem advisable. The whole may be preceded by a historical sketch of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3010; 1906, § 3408; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5938; 1930, § 2546; 1942, § 3374-76; Laws, 1922, ch. 236; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 76; Laws, 1982, ch. 372, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1982).

§ 21-13-17.
Clerk may furnish copy of ordinances in judicial proceedings.

Whenever in any judicial proceeding it shall be necessary to prove the existence of any municipal ordinance, a copy of such ordinance, certified to by the clerk of the municipality, or the ordinance book in which such ordinance is entered, may be introduced in evidence, and shall be prima facie evidence of the existence of such ordinance and that the same was adopted and published in the manner provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3409; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5939; 1930, § 2547; 1942, § 3374-77; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 77, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-13-19.
Misdemeanors under state penal laws as criminal offenses against municipalities.

All offenses under the penal laws of this state which are misdemeanors, together with the penalty provided for violation thereof, are hereby made, without further action of the municipal authorities, criminal offenses against the municipality in whose corporate limits the offenses may have been committed to the same effect as though such offenses were made offenses against the municipality by separate ordinance in each case. However, for such misdemeanor, any penalty of incarceration is hereby limited to no more than six (6) months in jail, and any fine is hereby limited to a maximum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each such violation in any case tried without a jury. Judgments for fines, costs, forfeitures and other penalties imposed by municipal courts may be enrolled by filing a certified copy of the record with the clerk of any circuit court and execution may be had thereon as provided by law for other judgments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3410; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5940; 1930, § 2549; 1942, § 3374-78; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 78; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 13; Laws, 1984, ch. 353, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 21-13-21.
Applicability of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under the code charter, a special charter, commission form, or other form of government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-81; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 81, eff from and after July 1, 1950.